Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Transitional Provisions

5-6-201. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-6-201 (Code 1858, § 420 (deriv. Acts 1857-58, ch. 38, § 4); Shan., § 512; Code 1932, § 764; Acts 1974, ch. 458, § 1; 1975, ch. 233, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-602; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 19; T.C.A., § 5-651), concerning county judges elected in 1974 for terms of eight years, is obsolete by virtue of its own provisions.

5-6-202, 5-6-203. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 5-6-202, 5-6-203 (Code 1958, § 4189 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 106, § 2); impl. am. 1875, ch. 70, §§ 1, 3; impl. am. 1877, ch. 106; Acts 1877, ch. 106, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 513-515, 6005, 6009-6011; Code 1932, §§ 765-767, 10203, 10208-10210; Acts 1974, ch. 736, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 5-604 — 5-607; Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 21), were repealed effective September 1, 1982, by Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 20. They concerned temporary provisions for presiding at meetings of former monthly county courts and county legislative bodies.

5-6-204. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 5-6-204 (Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 39; T.C.A., § 5-654), concerning jurisdiction of former county judges in certain counties, is obsolete due to the expiration in 1982 of the terms of county judges elected in 1974 for eight-year terms.

5-6-205. Effect on private and other acts.

Any law, private act or general act of local application in conflict with this chapter and chapters 1 and 5 of this title is hereby repealed.

Any law, private act or general law of local application not in conflict with this chapter and chapters 1 and 5 of this title shall remain in full force and effect; provided, that any conflict shall be construed in favor of implementing this chapter and chapters 1 and 5 of this title and repealing the conflicting law.

Nothing in this chapter and chapters 1 and 5 of this title shall be construed as affecting the operation or existence of boards, commissions, committees or other agencies of local government except as necessary to avoid conflict with express provisions hereof.

Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 40, 41; T.C.A., § 5-655.